Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-317
Loans from insurance client; restrictions.

No insurance producer, surplus lines licensee, or insurance consultant shall obtain a loan from an insurance client that is not a financial institution and who is not related to the insurance producer, surplus lines licensee, or insurance consultant by birth, marriage, or adoption.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 25.